Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.265

Statement of dissociation.

(1) A dissociated partner or the partnership may file a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the partner is dissociated from the partnership.

(2) A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a dissociated partner for the purposes of RCW 25.05.110 (2) and (3).

(3) For the purposes of RCW 25.05.255(1)(c) and 25.05.260(2)(c), a person not a partner is deemed to have notice of the dissociation ninety days after the statement of dissociation is filed.

[ 1998 c 103 s 704.]